New York, session 2025-2026, A1861.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 52-a to read as follows: 3 § 52-a. Liability insurance for police officers. Each police officer 4 employed by a city, county, town, village, authority or agency shall 5 obtain a policy of liability insurance. Each appointed police officer 6 must provide proof of liability insurance coverage required by this 7 section and must maintain continuous coverage throughout the course of 8 employment as a police officer. Such insurance shall cover claims 9 against such officer for acts or omissions during any period of time 10 that such officer is performing duties within the scope of employment of 11 such city, county, town, village, authority or agency. The city, county, 12 town, village, authority or agency shall cover the base rate of the 13 policy required by this section. 14 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 17 of the public officers law is amended 15 by adding a new paragraph (a-1) to read as follows: 16 (a-1) For the purposes of this section, the term "employee" shall not 17 include any police officer or peace officer as such terms are defined in 18 sections 1.20 and 2.10 of the criminal procedure law and section 14-102 19 of the administrative code of the city of New York. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03762-01-5